Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.632

Puget Sound water quality field agents program—Local field agents.

(1) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall jointly administer a program to provide field agents to work with local governments, property owners, and the general public to increase the propagation of shellfish, and to address Puget Sound water quality problems within Kitsap, Mason, and Jefferson counties that may limit shellfish propagation potential. The sea grant and cooperative extension shall each make available the services of no less than two agents within these counties for the purposes of this section.

(2) The responsibilities of the field agents shall include but not be limited to the following:

(a) Provide technical assistance to property owners, marine industry owners and operators, and others, regarding methods and practices to address nonpoint and point sources of pollution of Puget Sound;

(b) Provide technical assistance to address water quality problems limiting opportunities for enhancing the recreational harvest of shellfish;

(c) Provide technical assistance in the management and increased production of shellfish to facility operators or to those interested in establishing an operation;

(d) Assist local governments to develop and implement education and public involvement activities related to Puget Sound water quality;

(e) Assist in coordinating local water quality programs with regionwide and statewide programs;

(f) Provide information and assistance to local watershed committees.

(3) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall mutually coordinate their field agent activities to avoid duplicative efforts and to ensure that the full range of responsibilities under RCW 28B.30.632 through * 28B.30.636 are carried out. They shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership, created in RCW 90.71.210, and ensure consistency with any of the Puget Sound partnership's water quality management plans.

(4) Recognizing the special expertise of both agencies, the sea grant and cooperative extension shall cooperate to divide their activities as follows:

(a) Sea grant shall have primary responsibility to address water quality issues related to activities within Puget Sound, and to provide assistance regarding the management and improvement of shellfish production; and

(b) Cooperative extension shall have primary responsibility to address upland and freshwater activities affecting Puget Sound water quality and associated watersheds.

[ 2007 c 341 s 64; 1990 c 289 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.30.636 was repealed by 1998 c 245 s 176.

Effective date—2007 c 341: See RCW 90.71.907.